South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4606.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Veteran Housing Stability and Security Act." SECTION 2.  (A) The General Assembly finds: (1) South Carolina veterans experience disproportionate rates of homelessness and housing instability, especially in counties with rising rents and limited transitional housing. (2) Federal voucher access alone is insufficient when: (a) landlords deny voucher holders; and (b) counties lack fast-track development pathways. (3) Veteran homelessness is preventable, and the State has a moral interest in ensuring that those who defended this nation do not live without secure shelter. (B) This act establishes structural mechanisms to: (1) prioritize veteran housing development; (2) protect landlords who rent to veterans; and (3) expand transitional and long-term supportive housing capacity statewide. SECTION 3.  Chapter 15, Title 25 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 25-15-50.  (A)(1) Counties may designate Veteran Housing Priority Zones in census tracts with documented veteran homelessness. (2) Local governments must provide for zoning and permitting within forty-five days or less for veteran-supportive housing projects. (B) The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall administer a statewide landlord guarantee program which reimburses landlords up to three thousand five hundred dollars for damages or unpaid rent associated with veteran tenants using housing vouchers. (C) Faith-based and nonprofit organizations may apply for grants to establish veteran transitional housing, prioritizing counties with no existing units. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----